incubator/apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix
    <pardef n="ladak/A__n">
      <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rAjA/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="loh/A__n">
      <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="viXAwA/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kavi/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yoM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Axam/I__n">
      <e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyoM</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pAnI/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Sawru/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="katu/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Al/U__n">
      <e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uoM</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lahU/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ku/Az__n">
      <e><p><l>Az</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oM</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="redio/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="geh/Uz__n">
      <e><p><l>Uz</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Uz</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Uz</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uzoM</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BARAvix/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/A__sh">
      <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="alakawarA"><i>alakawarA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anehA"><i>anehA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ArakestrA"><i>ArakestrA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="araviMxabaMXu"><i>araviMxabaMXu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arikeSI"><i>arikeSI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Asakwi"><i>Asakwi</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="awixAwA"><i>awixAwA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aXirohI"><i>aXiroh</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bahanapA"><i>bahanap</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balavAn"><i>balavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balipaSu"><i>balipaSu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baniA"><i>bani</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bicCU"><i>bicC</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bikAU"><i>bikAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brahmA"><i>brahmA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="BrAwA"><i>BrAwA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="BUpawi"><i>BUpawi</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buxXimAn"><i>buxXimAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caMxrabiMxu"><i>caMxrabiMxu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cappA"><i>capp</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cattU"><i>catt</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cAyapAnI"><i>cAyapAnI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="CiCalA"><i>CiCal</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gehUz"><i>geh</i><par n="geh/Uz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="go"><i>go</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="halavA"><i>halav</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="haTayogI"><i>haTayog</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iMkA"><i>iMk</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jaMwu"><i>jaMwu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="juA"><i>ju</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="KadAUz"><i>KadA</i><par n="geh/Uz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kA"><i>k</i><par n="k/A__sh"/></e>
    <e lm="kAjU"><i>kAj</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kapAlI"><i>kapAlI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karaPyU"><i>karaPyU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karNakatu"><i>karNakatu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kAryakarwA"><i>kAryakarwA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="KAz"><i>K</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kiRkiMXyA"><i>kiRkiMXyA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koko"><i>koko</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuAz"><i>ku</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lalacAU"><i>lalacAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lokaBAvI"><i>lokaBAv</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mAjarA"><i>mAjar</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maXu"><i>maXu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miyAz"><i>miy</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naMxIpawi"><i>naMxIpawi</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nAnA"><i>nAnA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naPA"><i>naP</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nIgro"><i>nIgro</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nIMbU"><i>nIMb</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pAragAmI"><i>pAragAm</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paraSu"><i>paraSu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pariRax"><i>pariRax</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paxmaSrI"><i>paxmaSrI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PIwA"><i>PIw</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PlU"><i>PlU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Poto"><i>Poto</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rAjA"><i>rAjA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rAmasewu"><i>rAmasewu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rAmaXanuR"><i>rAmaXanuR</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="redio"><i>redio</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="royAz"><i>roy</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sahaBojI"><i>sahaBoj</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sA"><i>s</i><par n="k/A__sh"/></e>
    <e lm="Sakuni"><i>Sakuni</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="SaSI"><i>SaSI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sAsu"><i>sAsu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sawwU"><i>saww</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
    <e lm="So"><i>So</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="SqMgArajanmA"><i>SqMgArajanm</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sucAru"><i>sucAru</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="SvakrIdI"><i>SvakrId</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
    <e lm="swuwi"><i>swuwi</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tikaU"><i>tikaU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udIsA"><i>udIsA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uragaSawru"><i>uragaSawru</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uTAU"><i>uTAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="varanA"><i>varan</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
    <e lm="virAt"><i>virAt</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wrimUrwi"><i>wrimUrwi</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xamaAlU"><i>xamaAl</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xAru"><i>xAru</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xAwA"><i>xAwA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xInailAhI"><i>xInailAhI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="XuAz"><i>Xu</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yUz"><i>yUz</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
